Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Training Programs Concerning Domestic Violence

194.530.
Training and continuing education courses for Department for Social Services staff. [Repealed.]

194.535.
Training requirements for staff of agencies providing shelter services for victims. [Repealed.]

194.540.
Training courses for mental health professionals and health care providers. [Repealed.]